Idaho, session 2026, H0493.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-5614, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-5614. SOLICITING COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY. (1) A person is
guilty of soliciting commercial sexual activity when he or she:
(a) Pays, offers to pay, or agrees to pay another person a fee for the
purpose of engaging in sexual contact; or
(b) Offers a third person to engage in, or agrees to provide a third per-
son to engage in, sexual contact in return for a fee.
(2) Soliciting commercial sexual activity shall be a misdemeanor for
any person eighteen (18) years of age or older but under twenty-one (21)
years of age, provided that a second or subsequent conviction therefor shall
be a felony. Any person convicted of a misdemeanor violation of this section
shall be sentenced to a minimum period of confinement of five (5) days in jail
and may be sentenced to up to one (1) year in jail or fined up to two thousand
dollars ($2,000), or both. The minimum period of confinement shall be served
in a county jail, and a court shall not have the power to suspend, withhold,
retain jurisdiction over, or commute the minimum period of confinement im-
posed pursuant to this section.
(3) Soliciting commercial sexual activity shall be a felony for any
person twenty-one (21) years of age or older. Any person convicted of a
felony violation of this section shall be sentenced to a minimum period of
confinement of six (6) months in jail and may be sentenced to up to three (3)
years in jail or fined up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. The
minimum period of confinement shall be served in a county jail, and a court
shall not have the power to suspend, withhold, retain jurisdiction over, or
commute the minimum period of confinement imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.